Missouri, session 2026, SB1745.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.192, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 590.192,
to read as follows:
590.192. 1. There is hereby established the "Critical
Incident Stress Management Program" within the department of
public safety. The program shall provide services for peace
officers and first responders to assist in coping with
stress and potential psychological trauma resulting from a
response to a critical incident or emotionally difficult
event. Such services may include consultation, risk
assessment, education, intervention, and other crisis
intervention services provided by the department to peace
officers and first responders affected by a critical
incident. For purposes of this section, a "critical
incident" shall mean any event outside the usual realm of
human experience that is markedly distressing or evokes
reactions of intense fear, helplessness, or horror and
involves the perceived threat to a person's physical
integrity or the physical integrity of someone else. For

SB 1745 2
purposes of this section, the term "first responder" shall
have the same meaning as first responder in section 190.1010.
2. All peace officers and first responders shall be
required to meet with a program service provider once every
three to five years for a mental health check-in, or a
department established behavioral health or mental health
program that meets the requirements of subsection 1 which
shall satisfy this requirement. The program service
provider shall send a notification to the peace officer's
commanding officer, or first responder's commanding officer,
or first responder's director or supervisor that he or she
completed such check-in.
3. Any information disclosed by a peace officer or
first responder shall be privileged and shall not be used as
evidence in criminal, administrative, or civil proceedings
against the peace officer or first responder unless:
(1) A program representative reasonably believes the
disclosure is necessary to prevent harm to a person who
received services or to prevent harm to another person;
(2) The person who received the services provides
written consent to the disclosure; or
(3) The person receiving services discloses
information that is required to be reported under mandatory
reporting laws.
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "988 Public Safety Fund", which shall consist of moneys
appropriated by the general assembly. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and
moneys in the fund shall be used solely by the department of
public safety for the purposes of providing services for

SB 1745 3
peace officers and first responders to assist in coping with
stress and potential psychological trauma resulting from a
response to a critical incident or emotionally difficult
event pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. Such
services may include consultation, risk assessment,
education, intervention, and other crisis intervention
services provided by the department to peace officers or
first responders affected by a critical incident. The
director of public safety may prescribe rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2021, shall be invalid and void.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
✓